Idaho, session 2025, S1110.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to the programs listed in Gen-
eral Government the following amounts to be expended according to the desig-
nated programs and expense classes from the listed funds for the period July
1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
(1) DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION:
I. DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION:
A. MANAGEMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $212,200 $238,500 $450,700
Permanent Building
Fund 124,800 18,100 142,900
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 717,600 98,000 815,600
Federal Surplus Property Revolving
Fund 24,800 24,800
Employee Group Insurance
Fund 77,100 100 77,200
Retained Risk
Fund 37,800 37,800
Industrial Special Indemnity
Fund 24,000 0 24,000
TOTAL $1,218,300 $354,700 $1,573,000
B. PUBLIC WORKS:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,675,400 $1,675,400
Permanent Building
Fund $3,456,100 788,000 $131,300 4,375,400
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 3,192,300 12,365,900 0 15,558,200
TOTAL $6,648,400 $14,829,300 $131,300 $21,609,000
C. PURCHASING:
FROM:
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund $1,959,500 $358,400 $2,317,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Federal Surplus Property Revolving
Fund 244,000 415,600 659,600
TOTAL $2,203,500 $774,000 $2,977,500
D. INSURANCE MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
Employee Group Insurance
Fund $761,200 $431,800 $1,193,000
Retained Risk
Fund 855,000 232,500 1,087,500
Industrial Special Indemnity
Fund 231,000 102,100 333,100
TOTAL $1,847,200 $766,400 $2,613,600
E. DOCUMENT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $817,600 $817,600
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 433,300 $700,200 1,133,500
TOTAL $1,250,900 $700,200 $1,951,100
DIVISION
TOTAL $13,168,300 $17,424,600 $131,300 $30,724,200
II. CAPITOL COMMISSION:
FROM:
Capitol Commission Operating
Fund $142,000 $142,000
Capitol Maintenance Reserve
Fund 0 $2,200,000 2,200,000
TOTAL $142,000 $2,200,000 $2,342,000
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $13,168,300 $17,566,600 $2,331,300 $33,066,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
(2) OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR:
I. COMMISSION ON AGING:
FROM:
General
Fund $775,200 $331,000 $5,223,100 $6,329,300
Federal Grant
Fund 914,500 482,600 $72,900 9,021,900 10,491,900
TOTAL $1,689,700 $813,600 $72,900 $14,245,000 $16,821,200
II. COMMISSION ON THE ARTS:
FROM:
General
Fund $450,200 $175,300 $20,200 $324,700 $970,400
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 39,800 66,500 106,300
Federal Grant
Fund 517,800 193,500 28,500 500,200 1,240,000
TOTAL $968,000 $408,600 $48,700 $891,400 $2,316,700
III. COMMISSION FOR THE BLIND AND VISUALLY IMPAIRED:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,051,000 $153,600 $200 $599,200 $1,804,000
Randolph Sheppard
Fund 27,600 100,100 127,700
Rehabilitation Revenue and Refunds
Fund 34,300 13,000 47,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 28,100 56,300 84,400
Adaptive Aids and Appliances
Fund 27,700 62,900 90,600
Federal Grant
Fund 2,933,000 715,900 0 470,300 4,119,200
TOTAL $4,011,700 $1,022,400 $200 $1,238,900 $6,273,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
IV. OFFICE OF DRUG POLICY:
FROM:
General
Fund $332,400 $65,600 $398,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 24,500 24,500
Federal Grant
Fund 332,300 988,700 $3,209,800 4,530,800
TOTAL $664,700 $1,078,800 $3,209,800 $4,953,300
V. OFFICE OF ENERGY AND MINERAL RESOURCES:
FROM:
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund $235,000 $60,000 $295,000
Renewable Energy Resources
Fund 236,600 40,500 277,100
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 10,400 10,100 20,500
Petroleum Price Violation
Fund 280,100 183,100 $15,900 $58,000 537,100
Federal Grant
Fund 761,800 467,200 0 10,398,900 11,627,900
TOTAL $1,523,900 $760,900 $15,900 $10,456,900 $12,757,600
VI. DIVISION OF FINANCIAL MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,064,400 $252,900 $2,317,300
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 115,900 10,000 125,900
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 151,300 46,000 197,300
Administrative Code
Fund 460,200 193,700 653,900
American Rescue Plan
Fund $20,589,700 20,589,700


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
ARPA Homeowner Assistance
Fund 20,000,000 20,000,000
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 92,400 1,000,000 0 1,092,400
TOTAL $2,884,200 $1,502,600 $40,589,700 $44,976,500
VII. DIVISION OF HUMAN RESOURCES:
FROM:
Division of Human Resources
Fund $17,837,000 $1,372,600 $19,209,600
VIII. INFORMATION TECHNOLOGY SERVICES, OFFICE OF:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,836,900 $761,500 $2,598,400
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 25,104,200 6,903,600 $463,300 32,471,100
TOTAL $26,941,100 $7,665,100 $463,300 $35,069,500
IX. STATE LIQUOR DIVISION:
FROM:
Liquor Control
Fund $20,861,600 $5,503,100 $4,791,800 $31,156,500
X. MILITARY DIVISION:
A. MILITARY MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,678,700 $870,000 $650,000 $4,198,700
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund 419,100 83,200 502,300
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 765,900 765,900
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 3,234,300 1,124,400 $28,800 0 4,387,500
TOTAL $6,332,100 $2,843,500 $28,800 $650,000 $9,854,400


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
B. FEDERAL/STATE AGREEMENTS:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,339,600 $1,096,800 $2,436,400
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 2,047,100 435,200 2,482,300
Federal Grant
Fund 35,021,800 32,387,900 67,409,700
TOTAL $38,408,500 $33,919,900 $72,328,400
C. OFFICE OF EMERGENCY MANAGEMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,404,500 $222,400 $2,626,900
Federal Grant
Fund 3,400,500 5,128,300 $2,500,000 $11,225,600 22,254,400
TOTAL $5,805,000 $5,350,700 $2,500,000 $11,225,600 $24,881,300
DIVISION
TOTAL $50,545,600 $42,114,100 $2,528,800 $11,875,600 $107,064,100
XI. PUBLIC EMPLOYEE RETIREMENT SYSTEM:
A. RETIREMENT ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
PERSI Administrative
Fund $7,039,600 $2,645,000 $9,684,600
Judges' Retirement
Fund 82,000 1,000 83,000
TOTAL $7,121,600 $2,646,000 $9,767,600
B. PORTFOLIO INVESTMENT:
FROM:
PERSI Special
Fund $1,024,500 $211,900 $1,236,400
DIVISION
TOTAL $8,146,100 $2,857,900 $11,004,000


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
XII. OFFICE OF SPECIES CONSERVATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $983,700 $842,300 $1,826,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 20,000 20,000
Federal Grant
Fund 798,000 203,100 $17,140,000 18,141,100
TOTAL $1,781,700 $1,065,400 $17,140,000 $19,987,100
XIII. STEM ACTION CENTER:
FROM:
General
Fund $903,500 $1,343,200 $90,500 $1,000,000 $3,337,200
STEM Education
Fund 0 100,000 0 2,829,900 2,929,900
TOTAL $903,500 $1,443,200 $90,500 $3,829,900 $6,267,100
XIV. WOLF DEPREDATION CONTROL BOARD:
FROM:
General
Fund $392,000 $392,000
XV. WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT COUNCIL:
FROM:
Workforce Development Training
Fund $543,700 $446,400 $7,684,500 $8,674,600
In-Demand Careers
Fund 1,054,200 3,024,800 70,766,700 74,845,700
ARPA State Fiscal Recovery
Fund 193,100 632,300 825,400


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Federal Grant
Fund 132,000 50,000 0 182,000
TOTAL $1,923,000 $4,153,500 $78,451,200 $84,527,700
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $140,681,800 $72,153,800 $8,012,100 $181,928,400 $402,776,100
(3) DEPARTMENT OF REVENUE AND TAXATION:
I. BOARD OF TAX APPEALS:
FROM:
General
Fund $541,500 $88,700 $50,500 $680,700
II. STATE TAX COMMISSION:
A. GENERAL SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $8,181,400 $6,836,600 $95,500 $15,113,500
Multistate Tax Compact
Fund 144,900 584,100 2,500 731,500
Administration and Accounting
Fund 41,500 28,200 2,500 72,200
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 806,100 886,500 5,000 1,697,600
Seminars and Publications
Fund 0 21,500 0 21,500
TOTAL $9,173,900 $8,356,900 $105,500 $17,636,300
B. AUDIT DIVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $8,301,100 $628,000 $114,000 $9,043,100
Multistate Tax Compact
Fund 2,093,400 507,200 2,600,600
Administration and Accounting
Fund 18,900 24,400 43,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 2,191,500 360,400 0 2,551,900
TOTAL $12,604,900 $1,520,000 $114,000 $14,238,900
C. COMPLIANCE DIVISION:
FROM:
General
Fund $8,614,400 $1,239,300 $114,000 $9,967,700
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 264,600 29,600 0 294,200
TOTAL $8,879,000 $1,268,900 $114,000 $10,261,900
D. REVENUE OPERATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,881,900 $1,379,300 $6,261,200
Multistate Tax Compact
Fund 4,000 4,000
Administration and Accounting
Fund 98,400 17,100 115,500
Administration Services for Transportation
Fund 792,600 262,100 $2,300 1,057,000
Seminars and Publications
Fund 0 26,400 0 26,400
TOTAL $5,772,900 $1,688,900 $2,300 $7,464,100
E. PROPERTY TAX:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,341,900 $300,300 $4,642,200
Seminars and Publications
Fund 0 201,000 201,000
TOTAL $4,341,900 $501,300 $4,843,200
DIVISION
TOTAL $40,772,600 $13,336,000 $335,800 $54,444,400


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $41,314,100 $13,424,700 $386,300 $55,125,100
GRANDTOTAL $195,164,200 $103,145,100 $10,729,700 $181,928,400 $490,967,400
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In accordance with Section 67-3519,
Idaho Code, each of the programs in General Government is authorized no more
than the following number of full-time equivalent positions at any point
during the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, unless specifically
authorized by the Governor. The Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee
will be notified promptly of any increased positions so authorized.
Department of Administration .................................134.00
Commission on Aging ...........................................15.00
Commission on the Arts ........................................10.00
Commission for the Blind and Visually Impaired ..................43.12
Office of Drug Policy ..........................................6.00
Office of Energy and Mineral Resources .........................11.00
Division of Financial Management ..............................22.00
Division of Human Resources ..................................166.00
Office of Information Technology Services .....................221.00
State Liquor Division ........................................257.25
Military Division ...........................................429.80
Public Employee Retirement System of Idaho .....................81.00
Office of Species Conservation ................................16.00
STEM Action Center .............................................8.00
Workforce Development Council .................................14.00
Board of Tax Appeals ...........................................4.00
State Tax Commission .........................................440.00
SECTION 3. CASH TRANSFER TO THE ADMINISTRATION AND ACCOUNTING SERVICES
FUND. There is hereby appropriated and the Office of the State Controller
shall transfer $1,737,500 from the Permanent Building Fund to the Adminis-
tration and Accounting Services Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter
as practicable, for the Capitol Mall Facilities payment in the Division of
Public Works due in fiscal year 2026.
SECTION 4. CASH TRANSFER TO THE CAPITOL COMMISSION OPERATING FUND.
There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Administration for the
Idaho State Capitol Commission and the Office of the State Controller shall
transfer $250,000 from the Capitol Maintenance Reserve Fund to the Capitol
Commission Operating Fund on July 1, 2025, or as soon thereafter as practica-
ble, for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 5. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE IDAHO STATE CAPITOL COM-
MISSION. There is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Administration


for the Idaho State Capitol Commission any unexpended and unencumbered bal-
ances appropriated to the Department of Administration for the Idaho State
Capitol Commission from the Capitol Commission Operating Fund and the Capi-
tol Maintenance Reserve Fund for fiscal year 2025 to be used for nonrecurring
expenditures for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office
of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund,
expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to
processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 6. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE OFFICE OF DRUG POLICY.
There is hereby reappropriated to the Office of Drug Policy any unexpended
and unencumbered balance appropriated or reappropriated to the Office of
Drug Policy from the American Rescue Plan Fund for fiscal year 2025, in the
amount not to exceed $765,700 from the American Rescue Plan Fund, to be used
for nonrecurring expenditures related to drug use prevention services for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Con-
troller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund, expense class,
and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the
reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 7. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR ENERGY RESILIENCY GRANTS.
There is hereby reappropriated to the Office of Energy and Mineral Resources
any unexpended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to
the Office of Energy and Mineral Resources from the Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund for the purpose of the Energy Resiliency Grant Program for fiscal year
2025, in the amount not to exceed $10,641,800 from the Miscellaneous Rev-
enue Fund, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures related to the Energy
Resiliency Grant Program for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount,
by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office
prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 8. REVENUE REPORTS FOR THE STATE LIQUOR DIVISION. The State
Liquor Division shall deliver a report that compares forecast revenues,
distributed by month for the year, to the actual revenues and remaining fore-
casted revenues for the year on a monthly basis to the Legislative Services
Office. The report shall also include a forecast, updated monthly, of the
next fiscal year's anticipated revenues. The format of the report and the
information included therein shall be determined by the Legislative Ser-
vices Office.
SECTION 9. CONTINUOUS APPROPRIATION FOR THE MILITARY DIVISION. The
Military Division is hereby granted continuous appropriation authority for
the Idaho Office of Emergency Management's Miscellaneous Revenue Fund for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, for the purpose of covering
incurred costs arising out of hazardous substance incidents.
SECTION 10. CONTINUOUS APPROPRIATION FOR THE PUBLIC EMPLOYEE RE-
TIREMENT SYSTEM OF IDAHO. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section
59-1311(4)(d), Idaho Code, moneys appropriated in Section 1 of this act


for the Portfolio Investment Program within the Public Employee Retirement
System of Idaho are for administrative costs of the Portfolio Investment
Program as provided in Section 59-1311(3), Idaho Code. Amounts necessary
to pay all other investment expenses related to the Portfolio Investment
Program are perpetually appropriated to the Retirement Board as provided in
Section 59-1311(4)(a), (b) and (c), Idaho Code.
SECTION 11. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE ARPA STATE FISCAL RE-
COVERY FUND. There is hereby reappropriated to the Workforce Development
Council any unexpended and unencumbered balance appropriated or reappro-
priated to the Workforce Development Council from the ARPA State Fiscal
Recovery Fund for fiscal year 2025, to be used for workforce training grants
and childcare infrastructure grants for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappro-
priation amounts, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative
Services Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 12. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE IN-DEMAND CAREERS FUND.
There is hereby reappropriated to the Workforce Development Council any
unexpended and unencumbered balance appropriated or reappropriated to the
Workforce Development Council from the In-Demand Careers Fund for fiscal
year 2025, to be used for Idaho Launch grants for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the
reappropriation amounts, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Leg-
islative Services Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized
herein.
SECTION 13. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE WORKFORCE DEVELOPMENT
TRAINING FUND. There is hereby reappropriated to the Workforce Development
Council any unexpended and unencumbered balance appropriated or reappro-
priated to the Workforce Development Council from the Workforce Development
Training Fund for fiscal year 2025, to be used for semiconductor grants for
the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office of the State Con-
troller shall confirm the reappropriation amounts, by fund, expense class,
and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to processing the
reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 14. EMPLOYEE COMPENSATION. (1) Each agency and institution is
appropriated additional funding for change in employee compensation at the
equivalent increase of $1.55 per hour per full-time equivalent position for
permanent employees. Of this appropriation, agency heads and institution
presidents have flexibility to distribute no more than $1.55 per hour per
permanent employee and no less than $1.05 per hour per permanent employee,
provided that: (1) the employee's performance meets or exceeds expecta-
tions, and (2) the employee has been employed by the agency or institution
for at least six months. Notwithstanding Section 67-3511, Idaho Code, and
any other provision of law, additional funding provided in fiscal year 2026
appropriation acts for change in employee compensation shall not be trans-
ferred from personnel costs except for existing contractual obligations
requiring automatic salary or wage increases or for the ability to hire


emergency contract staff. No portion of the additional funding provided
in fiscal year 2026 appropriation acts for change in employee compensation
shall be used to fund bonuses or additional salary increases above $1.55 per
hour per permanent employee for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026, except in conditions specifically met in subsections (2), (3), (4),
or (5) of this section. Any unallocated additional funding from change in
employee compensation shall be reverted to the fund from which the appropri-
ation was made, and the agency head or institution president shall report
on the unallocated and reverted amount by fund source to the legislature by
June 30, 2026. Notwithstanding subsections (2), (3), (4), and (5) of this
section, agency heads and institution presidents shall report to the legis-
lature by June 30, 2026, the fund source and amount for any bonus or ongoing
salary increase greater than the $1.55 per hour per permanent employee from
funding not described in this section. The division of human resources shall
work with the office of the state controller to develop a monthly report
showing all pay changes and listing the pay changes by code. The legislative
services office shall approve the format of the report.
(2) The Division of Human Resources shall shift the primary compensa-
tion schedule's minimum and maximum amounts upward by an average of 3.2%, but
not less than $1.55 per hour, beginning on July 1, 2025, with the exception
of pay grade D where the minimum wage shall remain at $7.25 per hour. The
Division of Human Resources shall also shift the IT/engineering compensa-
tion schedule's minimum and maximum amounts upward by an average of 3%, but
not less than $1.55 per hour, shift the public safety compensation sched-
ule's minimum and maximum amounts upward by an average of 3.2%, but not less
than $1.55 per hour, and shift the nursing/healthcare compensation sched-
ule's minimum and maximum amounts upward by an average of 3.5%, but not less
than $1.55 per hour. The division shall maintain the job classifications
currently on payline exception. Additional funding is provided to ensure
employees are paid at the new minimum of their pay grade.
(3) Specific agencies are appropriated additional funding for a 4.5%
salary increase for classified and nonclassified IT and engineering state
employees to be distributed with flexibility for the agency head to recruit
and retain hard-to-fill positions.
(4) Idaho State Police is appropriated additional funding to provide
state troopers a salary increase that does not exceed 8% to be distributed
with flexibility for the agency head to recruit and retain positions.
(5) Specific agencies are provided additional funding for nursing and
healthcare employee salary increases of $1.55 per hour per permanent em-
ployee or 3%, whichever is greater, to be distributed with flexibility for
agency heads to recruit and retain positions.
SECTION 15. PLAN STRUCTURE. The Office of Group Insurance shall main-
tain the current health insurance plan structure and benefit package for
state employees. Adherence with the plan structure shall not preclude the
Office of Group Insurance from implementing positive plan changes as iden-
tified.
SECTION 16. ACCOUNTABILITY REPORTS. Funds specifically identified in
statute or in an appropriation act as intended for a certain purpose may


be used only for that purpose. Funds provided in this act are subject to
accountability reports and management reviews in accordance with Section
67-702, Idaho Code, provided the Legislative Services Office auditor has
sufficient resources to conduct those reports. State agencies who are au-
thorized to contract for outside audits shall submit those reports to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee when those reports become avail-
able.
SECTION 17. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions in this act.
SECTION 18. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.